Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVI Motor Vehicles
Tampering with Odometer

190.260.
Definitions for KRS 190.270 to 190.320.

As used in KRS

190.270

to

190.320

:

“Odometer” means an instrument for measuring and recording the actual distance a motor vehicle or motor home as defined in KRS

190A.010

travels while in operation; but shall not include any auxiliary odometer designed to be reset by the operator of the motor vehicle for the purpose of recording mileage on trips;

“Repair and replacement” means to restore to a sound working condition by replacing the odometer or any part thereof or by correcting what is inoperative; and

“Transfer” means to change ownership by purchase, gift, or any other means.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 246, § 1; 2014, ch. 27, § 22, effective January 1, 2015.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Comments, Precomplaint Investigations Under the Kentucky Consumer Protection Act: Validity and Scope of the Civil Investigation Demand, 65 Ky. L.J. 169 (1976-77).

190.270.
Unlawful acts — Suspension and revocation schedule for violations.

It is unlawful for any person to advertise for sale, to sell, to use, or to install or to have installed, any device which causes an odometer to register any mileage other than the true mileage driven. For purposes of this section, the true mileage driven is that mileage the vehicle has been driven as registered by the odometer within the manufacturer’s designed tolerance.

It is unlawful for any person or his agent to disconnect, reset, or alter the odometer of any motor vehicle or motor home with the intent to change the number of miles indicated thereon.

It is unlawful for any person with the intent to defraud to operate a motor vehicle or motor home on any street or highway knowing that the odometer of such vehicle is disconnected or nonfunctional.

The commission shall deny, suspend or revoke the license of any person who violates or causes, aids or abets any violation of this section which denial, suspension or revocation may be in addition to, and not exclusive of, any other penalties provided for elsewhere in this chapter.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 246, §§ 2, 3, 4; 1982, ch. 315, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 357, § 13, effective July 13, 1984; 2014, ch. 27, § 23, effective January 1, 2015.

190.280.
Conspiracy to violate provisions of KRS 190.260 to 190.320.

No person shall conspire with any other person to violate the provisions of KRS

190.260

to

190.320

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 246, § 5.

190.290.
Service, repair or replacement of odometer.

Nothing in KRS

190.260

to

190.320

shall prevent the service, repair, or replacement of an odometer, provided the mileage indicated thereon remains the same before the service, repair, or replacement. Where the odometer is incapable of registering the same mileage as before such service, repair, or replacement, the odometer shall be adjusted to read zero and a notice in writing shall be attached to the left door frame of the vehicle by the owner or his agent specifying the mileage prior to repair or replacement of the odometer and the date on which it was repaired or replaced. Any removal or alteration of such notice so affixed shall be unlawful.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 246, § 6.

190.300.
Disclosure of mileage upon transfer of motor vehicle or motor home.

Any transferor must give a written disclosure to the transferee in connection with the transfer of ownership of a motor vehicle or motor home:

Disclosing the cumulative mileage registered on the odometer.

Disclosure that the actual mileage is unknown, if the odometer reading is known to the transferor to be different from the number of miles the vehicle has actually traveled.

It shall be a violation of this section for any transferor to knowingly give a false statement to a transferee in making any disclosure required by this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 246, § 7; 2014, ch. 27, § 24, effective January 1, 2015.

190.310.
Liability for violation of KRS 190.270 to 190.320 with intent to defraud.

Any person who, with intent to defraud, violates any requirement imposed under KRS

190.270

to

190.320

shall be liable to the transferee in an amount equal to the sum of:

Three (3) times the amount of actual damages sustained or fifteen hundred dollars ($1,500), whichever is the greater; and

In the case of any successful action to enforce the foregoing liability, the costs of the action together with reasonable attorney fees as determined by the court.

An action to enforce any liability created under subsection (1) of this section, may be brought in a Circuit Court of a county in which the purchaser of the motor vehicle resides.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 246, § 8.

190.320.
Forms.

Compliance with KRS

190.300

shall be effected by use of forms prescribed by 15

U.S.C. secs. 1981

et seq.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 246, § 9.